District of Columbia statutes.
47-2847

Saving clause.

Any violation of any provision of law or regulation issued hereunder which is repealed by this chapter and any liability arising under such provisions or regulations may, if the violation occurred or the liability arose prior to such repeal, be prosecuted to the same extent as if this chapter had not been enacted.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 49
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 563, ch. 366
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(h), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-2348.
1981 Ed., § 47-2847.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.